Massachusetts, session 194th, S2833.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 184 of the General Laws is hereby amended adding the following 
section:-  
Section 36. Tenant Opportunity to Purchase Pilot Program  
(a) Municipalities may, pursuant to section 4 of chapter 4, establish a five-year tenant 
opportunity to purchase pilot program; provided, the executive office of housing and livable 
communities shall promulgate regulations setting forth eligibility criteria by zip code.  
Eligibility criteria shall including the following by zip code: (1) no less than 70 per cent 
of housing units are rental units; (2) high rates of displacement, indicated by disproportionately 
high eviction rate and applications for supportive housing programs; and (3) a high poverty rate 
measured by the percentage of individuals or families living at or below the federal poverty line.   
Upon the conclusion of the municipality’s five-year pilot program under this section, the 
municipality shall produce a report indicating effectiveness, including but not limited to the 

of 2 13 number of housing units purchased, number of evictions or other displacement avoided, and 
recommendations for implementing a permanent tenant opportunity to purchase program.  
SECTION 2. The office shall promulgate regulations by December 31, 2027, and shall 
start accepting applicants by June 30, 2028